Maryland, session 2026, HB1179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 51 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 51. APPLICATION STORE ACCOUNTABILITY ACT.
14–5101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ACCOUNT HOLDER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ASSOCIATED WITH
A MOBILE DEVICE.
(C) (1) “AGE CATEGORY” MEANS A CATEGORY BASED ON A RANGE OF
USER AGES.
(2) “AGE CATEGORY” INCLUDES:
(I) CHILD;
(II) YOUNGER TEENAGER;
(III) OLDER TEENAGER; AND
(IV) ADULT.
(D) “AGE CATEGORY DATA” MEANS INFORMATION ABOUT AN ACCOUNT
HOLDER’S AGE CATEGORY THAT IS COLLECTED BY AN APPLICATION STORE
PROVIDER AND IS SHARED WITH A DEVELOPER.

HOUSE BILL 1179 3
(E) “AGE RATING” MEANS ONE OR MORE CLASSIFICATIONS THAT ASSESS
THE SUITABILITY OF AN APPLICATION’S CONTENT AND FUNCTIONS FOR DIFFERENT
AGE GROUPS.
(F) (1) “APPLICATION” MEANS A SOFTWARE APPLICATION OR AN
ELECTRONIC SERVICE THAT A USER MAY RUN OR DIRECT ON A MOBILE DEVICE.
(2) “APPLICATION” INCLUDES A PRE–INSTALLED APPLICATION ON A
MOBILE DEVICE.
(G) “APPLICATION STORE” MEANS A PUBLICLY AVAILABLE WEBSITE,
SOFTWARE APPLICATION, OR ELECTRONIC SERVICE THAT ALLOWS ACCOUNT
HOLDERS TO DOWNLOAD APPLICATIONS FROM THIRD–PARTY DEVELOPERS ONTO A
MOBILE DEVICE.
(H) “APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON THAT OWNS,
OPERATES, OR CONTROLS AN APPLICATION STORE THAT ALLOWS ACCOUNT
HOLDERS IN THE STATE TO DOWNLOAD APPLICATIONS ONTO A MOBILE DEVICE.
(I) “CHILD” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS UNDER 13 YEARS OLD.
(J) “CONTENT DESCRIPTION” MEANS A DESCRIPTION OF THE SPECIFIC
CONTENT ELEMENTS OR FUNCTIONS THAT INFORMED AN APPLICATION’S AGE
RATING.
(K) “DEVELOPER” MEANS A PERSON THAT OWNS OR CONTROLS A
PRE–INSTALLED APPLICATION ON A MOBILE DEVICE OR AN APPLICATION MADE
AVAILABLE THROUGH AN APPLICATION STORE IN THE STATE.
(L) “DIVISION” MEANS THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION OF THE
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(M) “KNOWINGLY” MEANS TO ACT WITH ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OR TO ACT
WITH KNOWLEDGE FAIRLY INFERRED BASED ON OBJECTIVE CIRCUMSTANCES.
(N) (1) “MINOR” MEANS, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, A PERSON UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS.
(2) “MINOR” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE AGE OF
18 YEARS WHO IS MARRIED OR LEGALLY EMANCIPATED.
(O) “MINOR ACCOUNT” MEANS AN ACCOUNT WITH AN APPLICATION STORE
PROVIDER THAT:

HOUSE BILL 1179
(1) IS ESTABLISHED BY A PERSON FOR THE BENEFIT OF A MINOR; AND
(2) IS ASSOCIATED WITH A PARENT ACCOUNT.
(P) “MOBILE DEVICE” MEANS A PHONE OR GENERAL PURPOSE TABLET
THAT:
(1) PROVIDES CELLULAR OR WIRELESS CONNECTIVITY;
(2) IS CAPABLE OF CONNECTING TO THE INTERNET;
(3) RUNS A MOBILE OPERATING SYSTEM; AND
(4) IS CAPABLE OF RUNNING APPLICATIONS THROUGH A MOBILE
OPERATING SYSTEM.
(Q) “MOBILE OPERATING SYSTEM” MEANS SOFTWARE THAT:
(1) MANAGES MOBILE DEVICE HARDWARE RESOURCES;
(2) PROVIDES COMMON SERVICES FOR MOBILE DEVICE PROGRAMS;
(3) CONTROLS MEMORY ALLOCATION; AND
(4) PROVIDES INTERFACES FOR APPLICATIONS TO ACCESS DEVICE
FUNCTIONALITY.
(R) “OLDER TEENAGER” MEANS A PERSON WHO IS AT LEAST 16 YEARS OLD
AND UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS.
(S) “PARENT” MEANS A PERSON WHO IS REASONABLY BELIEVED TO BE A
PARENT, A LEGAL GUARDIAN, A PERSON WITH LEGAL CUSTODY, OR ANY OTHER
PERSON WHO HAS THE LEGAL AUTHORITY TO MAKE DECISIONS ON BEHALF OF A
MINOR UNDER STATE LAW.
(T) “PARENT ACCOUNT” MEANS AN ACCOUNT WITH AN APPLICATION STORE
PROVIDER THAT:
(1) IS VERIFIED AS ESTABLISHED BY A PERSON WHO THE
APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER HAS DETERMINED IS NOT A MINOR THROUGH THE
APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER’S AGE VERIFICATION METHODS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1179 5
(2) MAY BE AFFILIATED WITH ONE OR MORE MINOR ACCOUNTS.
(U) “PARENTAL CONSENT DISCLOSURE” MEANS INFORMATION PROVIDED
BY AN APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER THAT INCLUDES:
(1) IF THE APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER HAS AN AGE RATING FOR
AN APPLICATION OR IN–APPLICATION PURCHASE, THE AGE RATING FOR THE
APPLICATION OR IN–APPLICATION PURCHASE;
(2) IF THE APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER HAS A CONTENT
DESCRIPTION FOR AN APPLICATION OR IN–APPLICATION PURCHASE, THE CONTENT
DESCRIPTION FOR THE APPLICATION OR IN–APPLICATION PURCHASE;
(3) A DESCRIPTION OF:
(I) THE PERSONAL DATA COLLECTED BY THE APPLICATION
FROM AN ACCOUNT HOLDER; AND
(II) THE PERSONAL DATA SHARED BY THE APPLICATION WITH A
THIRD PARTY; AND
(III) THE METHODS IMPLEMENTED BY THE DEVELOPER TO
PROTECT THE PERSONAL DATA THAT IS COLLECTED.
(V) (1) “PRE–INSTALLED APPLICATION” MEANS AN APPLICATION, OR
PORTION OF AN APPLICATION, THAT HAS BEEN INSTALLED OR PARTIALLY
INSTALLED ON A MOBILE DEVICE BEFORE THE CONSUMER USES THE MOBILE
DEVICE FOR THE FIRST TIME, INCLUDING WEB BROWSERS, SEARCH ENGINES, AND
MESSAGING APPLICATIONS.
(2) “PRE–INSTALLED APPLICATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN
APPLICATION THAT IS A DEVICE DRIVER OR THAT ALLOWS A MOBILE DEVICE TO
PERFORM CORE OPERATIONS IN ORDER TO FUNCTION AS INTENDED.
(W) “SIGNIFICANT CHANGE” MEANS A MODIFICATION TO THE TERMS OF
SERVICE OR PRIVACY POLICY FOR AN APPLICATION THAT:
(1) MATERIALLY ALTERS THE CATEGORIES OF DATA COLLECTED,
STORED, OR SHARED;
(2) MATERIALLY ALTERS THE APPLICATION’S AGE RATING OR
CONTENT DESCRIPTIONS; OR

HOUSE BILL 1179
(3) INTRODUCES, WHERE NO IN–APPLICATION PURCHASES WERE
PREVIOUSLY PRESENT:
(I) IN–APPLICATION PURCHASES; OR
(II) ADVERTISEMENTS.
(X) “VERIFIABLE PARENTAL CONSENT” MEANS AUTHORIZATION THAT:
(1) IS PROVIDED BY A PARENT ACCOUNT;
(2) IS GIVEN AFTER AN APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER HAS CLEARLY
AND CONSPICUOUSLY PROVIDED THE PARENTAL CONSENT DISCLOSURE AS PART OF
THE APPLICATION DOWNLOAD, PURCHASE, OR IN–APPLICATION PURCHASE
PROCESS; AND
(3) REQUIRES THE PARENT TO MAKE AN AFFIRMATIVE CHOICE TO:
(I) GRANT CONSENT; OR
(II) DECLINE CONSENT.
(Y) “YOUNGER TEENAGER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AT LEAST 13
YEARS OLD AND YOUNGER THAN 16 YEARS OLD.
14–5102.
(A) AT THE TIME AN INDIVIDUAL CREATES AN ACCOUNT, AN APPLICATION
STORE PROVIDER SHALL:
(1) REQUEST AGE CATEGORY INFORMATION FROM THE INDIVIDUAL;
AND
(2) VERIFY THE INDIVIDUAL’S AGE CATEGORY USING:
(I) COMMERCIALLY AVAILABLE METHODS THAT ARE
REASONABLY DESIGNED TO ENSURE ACCURACY; OR
(II) AN AGE VERIFICATION METHOD OR PROCESS THAT
COMPLIES WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE DIVISION UNDER § 14–5104 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1179 7
(B) FOR AN ACCOUNT IN EXISTENCE BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, AN
APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER SHALL, ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027:
(1) REQUEST AGE CATEGORY INFORMATION FROM THE INDIVIDUAL;
AND
(2) VERIFY THE AGE CATEGORY OF THE INDIVIDUAL USING:
(I) COMMERCIALLY AVAILABLE METHODS THAT ARE
REASONABLY DESIGNED TO ENSURE ACCURACY; OR
(II) AN AGE VERIFICATION METHOD OR PROCESS THAT
COMPLIES WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE DIVISION UNDER § 14–5104 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) IF THE APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER DETERMINES THE INDIVIDUAL
IS A MINOR, THE PROVIDER SHALL:
(1) REQUIRE THE ACCOUNT TO BE AFFILIATED WITH A PARENT
ACCOUNT;
(2) OBTAIN VERIFIABLE PARENTAL CONSENT FROM THE HOLDER OF
THE AFFILIATED PARENT ACCOUNT EACH TIME BEFORE ALLOWING THE MINOR TO:
(I) DOWNLOAD AN APPLICATION;
(II) PURCHASE AN APPLICATION; OR
(III) MAKE AN IN–APPLICATION PURCHASE;
(3) AFTER RECEIVING NOTICE OF A SIGNIFICANT CHANGE FROM A
DEVELOPER:
(I) NOTIFY THE ACCOUNT HOLDER OF THE SIGNIFICANT
CHANGE; AND
(II) FOR A MINOR ACCOUNT:
1. NOTIFY THE PARENT ACCOUNT HOLDER; AND
2. OBTAIN RENEWED VERIFIABLE PARENTAL CONSENT
BEFORE PROVIDING ACCESS TO THE SIGNIFICANTLY CHANGED VERSION;

HOUSE BILL 1179
(4) PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO A DEVELOPER, IN
RESPONSE TO A REQUEST AUTHORIZED UNDER § 14–5103 OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(I) AGE CATEGORY DATA FOR AN ACCOUNT HOLDER; AND
(II) THE STATUS OF VERIFIABLE PARENTAL CONSENT FOR A
MINOR;
(5) PROVIDE A METHOD FOR A PARENT ACCOUNT HOLDER TO
WITHDRAW CONSENT AND NOTIFY A DEVELOPER WHEN THE PARENT REVOKES
VERIFIABLE PARENTAL CONSENT; AND
(6) PROTECT AGE CATEGORY DATA AND ANY ASSOCIATED
VERIFICATION DATA BY:
(I) LIMITING COLLECTION AND PROCESSING TO DATA
NECESSARY FOR:
1. VERIFYING AN ACCOUNT HOLDER’S AGE CATEGORY;
2. OBTAINING VERIFIABLE PARENTAL CONSENT; OR
3. MAINTAINING COMPLIANCE RECORDS; AND
(II) TRANSMITTING AGE CATEGORY DATA USING
INDUSTRY–STANDARD ENCRYPTION PROTOCOLS THAT ENSURE DATA INTEGRITY
AND DATA CONFIDENTIALITY; AND
(III) FOR A PRE–INSTALLED APPLICATION, IN RESPONSE TO A
REQUEST FROM A DEVELOPER;
1. PROVIDING AVAILABLE AGE CATEGORY
INFORMATION; AND
2. TAKING REASONABLE MEASURES TO FACILITATE
VERIFIABLE PARENTAL CONSENT FOR USE OF THE APPLICATION.
(D) AN APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER MAY NOT:
(1) ENFORCE A CONTRACT OR TERMS OF SERVICE AGAINST A MINOR
UNLESS THE APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER HAS OBTAINED VERIFIABLE PARENTAL
CONSENT;

HOUSE BILL 1179 9
(2) KNOWINGLY MISREPRESENT THE INFORMATION IN THE
PARENTAL CONSENT DISCLOSURE; OR
(3) SHARE AGE CATEGORY DATA AND ANY ASSOCIATED DATA EXCEPT
AS REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE OR OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY LAW.
14–5103.
(A) A DEVELOPER SHALL:
(1) VERIFY THROUGH THE APPLICATION STORE’S DATA–SHARING
METHODS:
(I) THE AGE CATEGORY DATA OF ACCOUNT HOLDERS; AND
(II) FOR A MINOR’S ACCOUNT, WHETHER VERIFIABLE
PARENTAL CONSENT HAS BEEN OBTAINED;
(2) NOTIFY APPLICATION STORE PROVIDERS OF A SIGNIFICANT
CHANGE TO AN APPLICATION;
(3) USE AGE CATEGORY DATA RECEIVED THROUGH THE
APPLICATION STORE’S DATA–SHARING METHODS TO:
(I) ENFORCE ANY DEVELOPER–CREATED AGE–RELATED
RESTRICTIONS, SAFETY–RELATED FEATURES, OR DEFAULTS; AND
(II) ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE LAWS AND
REGULATIONS; AND
(4) REQUEST AGE CATEGORY DATA OR VERIFIABLE PARENTAL
CONSENT:
(I) AT THE TIME AN ACCOUNT HOLDER:
1. DOWNLOADS AN APPLICATION;
2. PURCHASES AN APPLICATION; OR
3. LAUNCHES A PRE–INSTALLED APPLICATION FOR THE
FIRST TIME;

HOUSE BILL 1179
(II) WHEN IMPLEMENTING A SIGNIFICANT CHANGE TO THE
APPLICATION; OR
(III) TO COMPLY WITH APPLICABLE LAW.
(B) A DEVELOPER MAY REQUEST AGE CATEGORY DATA:
(1) NOT MORE THAN ONCE DURING EACH 12–MONTH PERIOD TO
VERIFY:
(I) THE ACCURACY OF AGE CATEGORY DATA ASSOCIATED WITH
AN ACCOUNT HOLDER; OR
(II) CONTINUED ACCOUNT USE WITHIN THE AGE CATEGORY;
(2) WHEN THERE IS REASONABLE SUSPICION OF:
(I) ACCOUNT TRANSFER; OR
(II) MISUSE OUTSIDE THE AGE CATEGORY; OR
(3) AT THE TIME AN ACCOUNT HOLDER CREATES A NEW ACCOUNT
WITH THE DEVELOPER.
(C) WHEN IMPLEMENTING ANY DEVELOPER–CREATED AGE–RELATED
RESTRICTIONS, SAFETY–RELATED FEATURES, OR DEFAULTS, A DEVELOPER SHALL
USE THE LOWEST AGE CATEGORY INDICATED BY:
(1) AGE CATEGORY DATA RECEIVED THROUGH THE APPLICATION
STORE’S DATA–SHARING METHODS; OR
(2) AGE DATA INDEPENDENTLY COLLECTED BY THE DEVELOPER.
(D) A DEVELOPER MAY NOT:
(1) ENFORCE A CONTRACT OR TERMS OF SERVICE AGAINST A MINOR
UNLESS THE DEVELOPER HAS VERIFIED THROUGH AN APPLICATION STORE’S
DATA–SHARING METHODS THAT VERIFIABLE PARENTAL CONSENT HAS BEEN
OBTAINED;
(2) KNOWINGLY MISREPRESENT ANY INFORMATION IN THE
PARENTAL CONSENT DISCLOSURE; OR

HOUSE BILL 1179 11
(3) SHARE AGE CATEGORY DATA WITH ANY PERSON.
14–5104.
THE DIVISION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING PROCESSES AND
MEANS BY WHICH AN APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER MAY VERIFY AN ACCOUNT
HOLDER’S AGE CATEGORY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 14–5102(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
14–5105.
(A) A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE, EXCEPT FOR § 13–411 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO REMEDIES PROVIDED UNDER TITLE 13 OF THIS
ARTICLE, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST AN
APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER OR A DEVELOPER TO RECOVER A CIVIL PENALTY
NOT TO EXCEED $7,500 FOR EACH VIOLATION.
(C) IF A MINOR WAS HARMED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
COURT SHALL AWARD A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF:
(1) REMEDIES PROVIDED UNDER TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) THE GREATER OF ACTUAL DAMAGES OR $1,000 FOR EACH
VIOLATION; AND
(3) PUNITIVE DAMAGES IF THE VIOLATION WAS EGREGIOUS.
14–5106.
(A) A DEVELOPER IS NOT LIABLE FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IF
THE DEVELOPER DEMONSTRATES THAT THE DEVELOPER:
(1) RELIED IN GOOD FAITH ON APPLICABLE AGE CATEGORY DATA
RECEIVED THROUGH AN APPLICATION STORE’S DATA–SHARING METHODS;

HOUSE BILL 1179
(2) RELIED IN GOOD FAITH ON NOTIFICATION FROM AN APPLICATION
STORE PROVIDER THAT VERIFIABLE PARENTAL CONSENT WAS OBTAINED IF THE
ACCOUNT HOLDER WAS A MINOR; AND
(3) COMPLIED WITH THE REQUIREMENTS DESCRIBED IN § 14–5103
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A DEVELOPER IS NOT LIABLE FOR A VIOLATION IN DETERMINING AN
APPLICATION’S AGE RATING AND CONTENT DESCRIPTION FOR PURPOSES OF §
14–5103(D)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE DEVELOPER:
(1) USES WIDELY ADOPTED INDUSTRY STANDARDS TO DETERMINE
THE APPLICATION’S AGE CATEGORY AND CONTENT DESCRIPTION; AND
(2) APPLIES THOSE STANDARDS CONSISTENTLY AND IN GOOD FAITH.
(C) THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (B) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) APPLY ONLY TO ACTIONS BROUGHT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) DO NOT LIMIT THE LIABILITY OF A DEVELOPER OR AN
APPLICATION STORE UNDER ANY OTHER APPLICABLE LAW.
(D) NOTHING IN THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CONSTRUED AS LIMITING OR
NEGATING ANY OTHER AVAILABLE REMEDIES OR RIGHTS AUTHORIZED UNDER THE
LAWS OF THE STATE OR THE UNITED STATES.
14–5107.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) PREVENT AN APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER OR A DEVELOPER
FROM TAKING REASONABLE MEASURES TO:
(I) BLOCK, DETECT, OR PREVENT DISTRIBUTION TO MINORS
OF:
1. UNLAWFUL MATERIAL;
2. OBSCENE MATERIAL; OR
3. OTHER HARMFUL MATERIAL;

HOUSE BILL 1179 13
(II) BLOCK OR FILTER SPAM;
(III) PREVENT CRIMINAL ACTIVITY; OR
(IV) PROTECT THE APPLICATION STORE OR APPLICATION
SECURITY;
(2) REQUIRE AN APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER TO DISCLOSE USER
INFORMATION TO A DEVELOPER BEYOND AGE CATEGORY DATA OR STATUS OF
VERIFIABLE PARENTAL CONSENT;
(3) ALLOW AN APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER OR A DEVELOPER TO
IMPLEMENT MEASURES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IN A MANNER THAT IS
ARBITRARY, CAPRICIOUS, ANTICOMPETITIVE, OR UNLAWFUL;
(4) REQUIRE AN APPLICATION STORE PROVIDER OR DEVELOPER TO
BLOCK ACCESS TO AN APPLICATION THAT AN ACCOUNT HOLDER HAS DOWNLOADED
OR INSTALLED ONTO A MOBILE DEVICE, EXCEPT WHEN:
(I) A PARENT ACCOUNT HOLDER REVOKES VERIFIABLE
CONSENT FOR AN AFFILIATED MINOR ACCOUNT; OR
(II) THERE IS A SIGNIFICANT CHANGE TO THE APPLICATION;
(5) REQUIRE A DEVELOPER TO COLLECT, RETAIN, RE–IDENTIFY, OR
LINK ANY INFORMATION BEYOND THAT WHICH IS:
(I) NECESSARY TO VERIFY AGE CATEGORY DATA AS REQUIRED
BY THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) COLLECTED, RETAINED, RE–IDENTIFIED, OR LINKED IN
THE DEVELOPER’S ORDINARY COURSE OF BUSINESS; OR
(6) RELIEVE A DEVELOPER OF THE DEVELOPER’S OBLIGATION TO
CONDUCT AGE VERIFICATION AS OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY LAW, EXCEPT THAT A
DEVELOPER MAY RELY ON AGE CATEGORY DATA OBTAINED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
IF THE AGE CATEGORY DATA SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS OF APPLICABLE LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.

HOUSE BILL 1179
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.